Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 1. Establishment, Organization, and Programs of the University of Alaska.

Collateral references. —

15A Am. Jur. 2d Colleges and Universities, § 1 et seq.

14A C.J.S. Colleges and Universities, § 1.

Determination of residence or nonresidence for purpose of admission to public college. 83 ALR2d 497; 56 ALR3d 641.

Liability of university, college or other school for failure to protect student from crime. 1 ALR4th 1099.

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for educational malpractice. 1 ALR4th 1139.

Sec. 14.40.010.
University of Alaska.

The University of Alaska consists of the College of Agriculture, the School of Mines, the Department of Agricultural Experiment Station, the Department of Agricultural Extension Work, and other colleges and departments that may be established, including departments of anthropology, archaeology, ethnology, museum, natural history, and palaeontology.

History.

(§ 37-10-1 ACLA 1949)

Cross references. —

For the constitutional basis of the University of Alaska, see Alaska Const., art. VII, § 2.

Sec. 14.40.020.
Site of university.

The University of Alaska is the beneficiary under the provisions of the Act of Congress approved August 30, 1890, designating the Alaska Agricultural College and School of Mines as beneficiary and the four sections of land specified by the Act of Congress approved March 4, 1915, and used as a site for the Alaska Agricultural College and School of Mines are the site for the University of Alaska.

History.

(§ 37-10-9 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 14.40.030.
Transfer of powers, duties, and obligations of Agricultural College and School of Mines under Acts of Congress.

All powers, duties, and obligations devolving upon the Alaska Agricultural College and School of Mines in connection with or by reason of Acts of Congress, past or future, in relation to agricultural colleges and agricultural or mining experiment stations, extension work in agriculture, and instruction and extension work in the mechanic arts granted to and imposed upon the Alaska Agricultural College and School of Mines are granted and conveyed to and imposed upon the University of Alaska, and beginning with the first day of July, 1935, the University of Alaska is designated to receive all money, appropriations, and grants to the state for the purposes set forth in this chapter. The comptroller of the University of Alaska is designated and appointed to receive directly and to disburse all funds that the state is entitled to receive under the Act of Congress of May 8, 1914 (38 Stat. 372), as amended by the Act of June 26, 1953 (67 Stat. 83; 7 U.S.C. 341 — 348).

History.

(§ 37-10-8 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 107 SLA 1957)

Sec. 14.40.040.
General powers and duties of the university.

There is created and established a corporation to be called the University of Alaska. It may in that name

sue and be sued;

receive and hold real and personal property;

contract and be contracted with; a contract entered into by the University of Alaska for the

rent or lease of premises for use and occupancy by the University of Alaska is subject to AS

36.30.080(c)

; however, notwithstanding the limitation imposed by AS

36.30.080(c)(2)

, the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska

may enter into a lease with a term described in (ii) of this subparagraph if the rent under the lease will be paid solely from a grant or contract made by the federal government or an agency of the federal government, and the grant or contract contains a firm commitment of not more than two years, or if the rent payable under the lease will be paid solely from university receipts as that term is defined in AS

14.40.491

; and

when authorized by (i) of this subparagraph, may enter into a lease with an initial term equal to the period of the firm commitment of the grant or contract, or with an initial term not to exceed two years when the rent is payable from university receipts; the lease may contain one or more optional renewal periods, but the total of all optional renewal periods may not exceed an additional five years;

acquisition of property by a lease-purchase or lease-financing agreement for the benefit of the University of Alaska is subject to AS

36.30.085

;

adopt, use, and alter a corporate seal;

borrow money, issue debt, or enter into long-term obligations for the purchase of facilities, goods, or services; the obligations may secure, in whole or in part, debt issued by another party;

do and have done all matters necessary for the purpose of any function set out in this chapter.

The Board of Regents of the University of Alaska shall provide scholarship information to school districts as required by AS

14.43.930(a)

.

History.

(§ 37-10-2 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 181 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 75 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 90 SLA 1999)

Sec. 14.40.043.
University of Alaska office of public safety.

The Board of Regents may establish an office of public safety and prescribe the conditions of employment of public safety officers employed by the office. University of Alaska public safety officers have general police powers to enforce state and local laws in connection with offenses committed on property of the university.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1992)

Sec. 14.40.045.
Religious or partisan instruction, tests, and appointments.

No instruction either sectarian in religion or partisan in politics shall be permitted in any department of the University of Alaska and no sectarian or partisan test shall be allowed or exercised in the appointment of regents, instructors, or other officers of the University of Alaska or in the admission of students or for any purpose.

History.

(§ 37-10-6 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.40.180

.
Renumbered in 1992.

Collateral references. —

Validity of governmental requirement of oath of allegiance or loyalty as applied to college curators. 18 ALR2d 303.

Sec. 14.40.050.
Discrimination because of sex, color, or nationality prohibited.

A person may not be deprived of the privileges of the University of Alaska because of sex, color, or nationality.

History.

(§§ 37-10-4(h), 37-10-24 ACLA 1949)

Cross references. —

For additional provisions related to sex-based discrimination in education, see AS 14.18; for prohibitions against discrimination generally, see AS

18.80.200

and

18.80.210

.

Sec. 14.40.055.
Educational expansion program.

To expand educational and cultural opportunities in the state, to keep pace with the expansion of the state in other fields, and to provide educational facilities of particular interest to residents of the state, the Board of Regents shall

make a study of the principles and applicability of the junior college to the state;

establish additional extension courses and such other expansion of accredited courses for students as it considers advisable;

provide facilities suitable for carrying out a university program;

employ personnel;

procure supplies;

take all other appropriate measures to carry out the intent and purpose set forth in this section; and

develop and offer at one or more of the senior college or community college campuses a continuing professional education program for architects, engineers, building officials, and officers and employees of financial institutions on alternative energy systems and on energy conservation and solar design and construction methods applicable to the state.

History.

(§§ 1 — 3 ch 58 SLA 1951; am § 2 ch 83 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.40.260

.
Renumbered in 1992.

Sec. 14.40.057.
Extension of compliance acts.

Laws of the state designed to meet requirements of the United States government for the state’s acceptance of federal grants and allotments for educational and kindred purposes are extended to cover the establishment and operation of the university expansion program set forth in AS

14.40.055

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 58 SLA 1951)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

14.40.270

.
Renumbered in 1992, at which time “AS

14.40.055

” was substituted for “AS

14.40.260

” to reflect the renumbering of former AS

14.40.260

.

Sec. 14.40.060.
University curriculum.

The University of Alaska shall use the property and funds acquired for the purpose of conducting a college where the leading objects shall be, without excluding other scientific and classical studies and including military tactics, to teach branches of learning related to agriculture, the mechanic arts, and household economics in order to promote a liberal and practical education.

History.

(§ 37-10-4(h) ACLA 1949)

Sec. 14.40.065.
Student practicums immunity.

A person is not considered to be an employer of a student of the University of Alaska in a civil action based on the vicarious liability of an employer for the acts or omissions of an employee if the person

has agreed to allow the student to gain practical work experience with the person in a practicum that is part of the student’s curriculum; and

pays no compensation to the student.

History.

(§ 1 ch 102 SLA 2004)

Sec. 14.40.070.
Collection of fossil remains authorized.

The University of Alaska may collect and store the bones and other remains of the mammoth, mastodon, horse, bison, and other fossil remains of these and other extinct animals found in the state in mining and other excavations.

History.

(§ 37-10-19 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 14.40.075.
Alaska Earthquake and Volcanic Hazards Assessment Project; state seismologist.

The University of Alaska shall establish an Alaska Earthquake and Volcano Hazards Assessment Project within the seismology program of the geophysical institute. The project shall

collect, record, process, and archive seismic data on earthquakes and volcanic eruptions in the state;

conduct seismological studies relating to earthquake and volcano hazards assessment;

evaluate earthquake and volcanic seismic data to assist in the identification and assessment of earthquake and volcanic hazards that may pose a significant risk to lives and property in the state;

inform public officials, industry, and private citizens of potential earthquake or volcanic risks and assist in planning to reduce risks to lives and property; and

coordinate its activities with other organizations and agencies that monitor, collect, assess, and conduct research on earthquake and volcano hazards in order to avoid duplication of effort.

The administration and management of the project are under a university employee designated the state seismologist. The state seismologist shall provide timely information concerning earthquake and volcano hazards to public officials, industry, and private citizens and serve as liaison to state and federal agencies in the event of emergencies due to seismic and volcanic activities.

History.

(§ 2 ch 36 SLA 1987)

Sec. 14.40.080.
Establishment of Institute of Marine Sciences.

The University of Alaska may establish an Institute of Marine Sciences to provide a program of education and research in physical, chemical, and biological oceanography, and related fields.
When established, the Institute of Marine Sciences shall be maintained and operated as an integral part of the University of Alaska, at one or more sites determined by the Board of Regents.
The powers, duties, and functions of the Board of Regents pertaining to the University of Alaska extend to the Institute of Marine Sciences in the same manner as to other departments or institutes of the university.

History.

(§§ 1, 2 ch 149 SLA 1960)

Sec. 14.40.082.
Unmanned aircraft system training.

The University of Alaska may establish a training program in the operation of unmanned aircraft systems.

History.

(§ 1 ch 105 SLA 2014)

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 105, SLA 2014, which enacted this section, took effect on October 26, 2014.

Sec. 14.40.085.
Alaska State Climate Center; state climatologist.

The University of Alaska shall establish an Alaska State Climate Center within an appropriate unit of the university. The administration and management of the center is under the direction of a university employee designated the “state climatologist.”

The Alaska State Climate Center shall

prepare and update on a biennial basis a plan for the systematic acquisition and dissemination of climate-related information; the plan must include

an assessment of weather and climate information needs in Alaska;

a reasonable basis for setting priorities among these needs; and

a program for coordinating the activities of all available sources of weather- and climate-related information sources in order to meet the highest priority needs and to carry out the provisions of this section;

establish a state climate planning advisory group composed of at least three members from organizations that provide climate-related information, and at least three members from organizations that use climate-related information on a regular basis or from the general public;

solicit and consider the advice and recommendations of the state climate planning advisory group in preparing and updating the biennial plan for acquisition and dissemination of climate-related information;

operate and maintain a central repository and archive for reports, books, maps, and other records, and publications relating to weather and climatological information;

provide for public access to weather and climatological information and technical advisory services; and

enter into cooperative agreements, on behalf of the state and the university, in order to achieve intergovernmental climate program participation by the United States and the state; these agreements must be consistent with the provisions of 15 U.S.C. 2901 — 2908 (National Climate Program Act).

The Alaska State Climate Center may

investigate, describe, and interpret the characteristics of the weather and climate of the state, including their hazards and limitations;

coordinate with state and federal agencies in matters concerning weather data acquisition, collection, integration, and storage;

monitor federal weather-related activities to assure that the interests of the state are being served;

conduct research activities on the availability of solar, wind, and water resources that assess the impact of climate fluctuations on these resources;

publish bulletins, circulars, maps, or reports of the results of all research and investigations undertaken by the climate center, and distribute them to state agencies, government officials, industry, and the public;

provide lectures, talks, displays, and exhibits on the climate of the state for the general education of the public; and

enter into cooperative arrangements with local, state, and federal government agencies; foundations; universities; businesses; and other organizations engaged in climate-related research and services.

History.

(§ 2 ch 105 SLA 1981)

Sec. 14.40.087.
Alaska Center for International Business. [Repealed, § 3 ch 43 SLA 1987.]

Sec. 14.40.088.
Establishment of Institute for Circumpolar Health Studies.

The University of Alaska shall establish an Institute for Circumpolar Health Studies in an appropriate unit of the university at its Anchorage campus. The institute shall consist of a research and instruction branch and an administration and information branch.

The institute shall

encourage international cooperation, especially among circumpolar nations, with regard to research, studies, information, and instruction relating to circumpolar health issues;

serve as a center for the collection and exchange of information and medical and health sciences data relating to circumpolar health issues;

provide a mechanism for communication and cooperation between the university and the commissioner of health and social services in addressing the needs of Alaskans for health care services, opportunities for education in medical and health sciences, and other mutual concerns of the university and the department; and

conduct research and provide instruction and other services consistent with the mission and goals of the University of Alaska.

History.

(§ 2 ch 136 SLA 1988)

Sec. 14.40.090.
Correspondence courses for prospectors and miners.

The University of Alaska shall establish and offer to bona fide Alaska prospectors and miners in the state a correspondence course equal and parallel to the mining extension course being taught at present.

The University of Alaska may establish the minimum charge necessary to defray costs of material, books, and postage used in the course.

History.

(§§ 1, 2 ch 14 SLA 1957)

Sec. 14.40.095.
Establishment of a Center for Information Technology at University of Alaska Anchorage.

The University of Alaska may establish a Center for Information Technology at the University of Alaska Anchorage with major components at the University of Alaska Fairbanks and the University of Alaska Southeast. The center may charge fees for the services it provides. The university shall account for all fees collected under this section. The annual estimated balance in the account may be used by the legislature to make appropriations to the university to carry out the purposes of this section.

The center may

provide support for education, training, and research in information technologies to students, professionals, and the general public;

support research on the applications, effects, and management of information technologies and provide research results to the general public;

maintain an inventory of telecommunication research in the state;

develop and maintain a collection that includes state documents, research reports, and other telecommunication applications materials including videotapes, software, lesson plans, and scripts;

support the development and expansion of the geographic information system curriculum of the University of Alaska, including the possible establishment of undergraduate and masters programs;

develop and sponsor land record and geographic information system training workshops and continuing education seminars in cooperation with the appropriate departments of the university;

support or undertake research projects that apply geographic information technology to state issues and problems;

provide information on the availability of federal, state, municipal, and other sources of geographic information, including aerial photography and digital data bases related to surveying and land records, natural resource inventories, and related data;

prepare and publish on a regular basis research findings and periodicals relating to the center’s activities;

assist state agencies and municipalities in the development of policies, procedures, and capabilities for public access to automated geographic information;

recommend, in consultation with the commissioner of administration and affected state and local agencies and advisory boards, model standards and strategies relating to the implementation, indexing, documentation, mapping, data exchange, and other aspects of land records management and geographic information system development.

The university shall include in its annual report a summary of the center’s revenue and expenditures during the preceding two years.

History.

(§ 3 ch 74 SLA 1990; am § 12 ch 21 SLA 1995; am E.O. No. 113 § 3 (2005))

Sec. 14.40.100.
College extension service.

The Board of Regents may conduct a college extension service, the leading object of which is to carry information on rural life subjects to the people of the state.

History.

(§ 37-10-4(h) ACLA 1949)

Sec. 14.40.110.
Establishment of Business, Economics, and Public Administration Research Program.

The University of Alaska may establish a Business, Economics, and Public Administration Research Program for the purpose of developing and publishing statistics and other information regarding the economy, government, and resources of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 80 SLA 1961)

Sec. 14.40.115.
Establishment of Mineral Industry Research Program.

The University of Alaska shall establish a Mineral Industry Research Program and coordinate with state and federal mineral agencies to implement the program by

using the laboratory facilities and staff of the College of Earth Sciences and Mineral Industry to initiate applied and appropriate basic research in the areas of mineral beneficiation, mine and mill design, new mineral product development, and improvement of exploration methods, such as geochemical and geophysical prospecting;

making the facilities of the program available for research on mineral deposits in the state;

making studies on specific problems relative to Alaska’s mineral industry upon request.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1963)

Sec. 14.40.117.
Establishment of Alaska Native Language Center.

The University of Alaska shall establish an Alaska Native Language Center, the purposes of which are to

study languages native to Alaska;

develop literacy materials;

assist in the translation of important documents;

provide for the development and dissemination of Alaska Native literature; and

train Alaska Native language speakers to work as teachers and aides in bilingual classrooms.

History.

(§ 1 ch 175 SLA 1972)